Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-311
Telecommunications relay system, defined.

Telecommunications relay system means a service permitting full and simultaneous communication between deaf, hard of hearing, or speech-impaired persons using specialized telecommunications equipment and other persons using conventional telephone equipment.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 189.